District of Columbia statutes.
28-3314

Right of action.

Any borrower who suffers a violation of any provision of this chapter by any lender may bring an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to recover, or obtain, or enforce any of the following:

(1)

reasonable attorney’s fees;

(2)

actual and punitive damages; or

(3)

any other relief which the court deems proper.

History

Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-62, § 4, 31 DCR 114
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 27(h), 44 DCR 1271

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28-3301.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3314.